Louisiana, session 2026, HB572.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.25 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.25. Resilient Youth and Trauma-Informed Schools Grant Pilot Program
A.(1) The state Department of Education shall establish and administer the
Resilient Youth and Trauma-Informed Schools Grant Pilot Program, referred to in
this Section as the "program".
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules for the program in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act including but not limited to an application process for eligible schools to
participate in the program and eligible expenses for which funds may be allocated.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Department" means the state Department of Education.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 572
(2) "Eligible school" means a public school where the percentage of students
who receive free or reduced lunch is sixty percent or higher.
(3) "Resilience curricula" means programs for teaching emotional regulation,
goal-setting, and growth mind set.
(4) "Social-emotional learning curricula" means educational programs with
tools, resources, and guidance for teachers to help students develop social and
emotional knowledge, skills, and abilities.
(5) "Trauma-informed practices" means evidence-based approaches
recognizing impacts of trauma on learning.
C.(1) Through the program, the department shall issue grants to eligible
schools for any of the following purposes:
(a) Employing school counselors and social workers.
(b) Providing trauma-informed training to school administrators, teachers,
and school employees.
(c) Implementing resilience curricula, social-emotional learning curricula,
and trauma-informed practices.
(d) Establishing mentorship networks via student organizations at
universities and civic organizations in the community.
(e) Tracking outcomes of the program.
(2) Each participating school shall collaborate with a Louisiana university
to evaluate student attendance prior to and after starting the program, student
discipline, and mental health indicators and submit annual reports to the department
concerning such matters.
(3) The department shall annually submit a cumulative report to the
legislature regarding program activities, outcomes, and recommendations.
D. The implementation of this Section is subject to appropriation of funds
by the legislature for this purpose. The department and participating schools may
use donations for the purposes of implementing the program.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 572
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Resilient Youth and
Trauma-Informed Schools Act".
Section 3. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall promulgate
rules as provided in Section 1 of this Act prior to the beginning of the fall 2028 academic
semester.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.